Wyoming, session 2025, HB0163.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-7-201 is created to read:

ARTICLE 2
UNAUTHORIZED ALIENS

6-7-201. Employment of unauthorized aliens
prohibited.

HB0163

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0467
(a) No person shall employ or otherwise contract for
services with a person who:

(i) Is or becomes unlawfully present in the
United States in violation of federal law; or

(ii) Is not or becomes not lawfully authorized
to work in the United States in violation of federal law.

(b) A person who violates subsection (a) of this
section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of:

(i) One thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for a first
offense under this section;

(ii) Five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for a
second or subsequent offense under this section.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(i) The prohibition of subsection (a) of this
section shall not apply to any employed or contracted
person who has an appropriate visa or other work
HB0163

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0467
authorization to be present and work in the United States
that is valid and current;

(ii) Any employer who employs or contracts for
services with workers who are or were lawfully present but
who are acting in accordance with federal law to renew or
continue their lawful status shall not be subject to the
prohibition in subsection (a) of this section;

(iii) Each person who is employed, contracted
with or continued to be employed in violation under
subsection (a) of this section shall constitute a separate
offense.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0163